Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3625
Sinking fund; transfer of excess by county board.

All the sewer taxes, usage fees, and other revenue provided for in the County Industrial Sewer Construction Act shall, when levied and collected, constitute a sinking fund for the purpose of paying the cost of the improvements with allowable interest and shall be solely and strictly applied to such purpose to the extent required. Any excess may be by the county board, after fully discharging the purposes for which levied, transferred to such other fund or funds as the county board may deem advisable.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 25.